Utah statutes.
78B-2-219.   Adverse possession -- Action to redeem mortgage of real property.

An action to redeem a mortgage of real property, with or without an account of rents and profits, may not be brought by the mortgagor, or those claiming under him, against the mortgagee in possession, or those claiming under him, unless an adverse possession of the mortgaged premises for seven years after breach of some condition of the mortgage has been continuously maintained by the mortgagor or those claiming under him.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

